District of Columbia statutes.
24-921

Definitions.

For the purposes of this subchapter, the term:

(1)

“BOOT CAMP” means the Basic Operations Options Training Children to Adults Maturity Program for eligible juvenile offenders, established pursuant to the rules of the Department of Human Services adopted under this subchapter, which provides rigorous physical activity, intensive regimentation, discipline, education, and vocational training for a minimum of 40 participants, to begin the program, for a period of 90 days.

(2)

“Eligible juvenile offender” means a youth 14 through 18 years of age who has been committed to the custody of the Youth Services Administration and who:

(A)

Has not been previously incarcerated in an adult prison facility and has not committed a crime of violence, as defined in § 22-4501, except burglary and robbery;

(B)

Has not been prohibited by a judge or law from participating in the BOOT CAMP;

(C)

Has no known contagious or communicable disease;

(D)

Has no known mental or physical impairments that would prevent him or her from performing physical activity; and

(E)

Agrees to the terms and conditions of the BOOT CAMP.

History

Jan. 27, 1994, D.C. Law 10-67, § 101, 40 DCR 5768

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 24-821.